Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2461
Termination of appointment; special administrator.

The appointment of a special administrator terminates in accordance with the provisions of the order of appointment, other order of the court, or on the appointment of a personal representative. In other cases, the appointment of a special administrator is subject to termination as provided in sections 30-2451 to 30-2454.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 139, UPC § 3-618;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 16.